Maryland, session 2026, HB0272.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
21–325.
(d) (1) This subsection applies only to a food establishment that is:
(i) A business that conducts agritourism, as defined in § 4–212 of
the Land Use Article;
(ii) A Class 4 limited winery licensed under § 2–206 of the Alcoholic
Beverages and Cannabis Article; and
(iii) A Class 8 farm brewery licensed under § 2–210 of the Alcoholic
Beverages and Cannabis Article.
– 1 –

Ch. 189 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) A food establishment may comply with the requirement to provide a
convenient lavatory by providing a portable [chemical] toilet that:
(i) Otherwise meets the requirements of subsection (a)(2) or (b)(2) of
this section; and
(ii) Is placed at least 25 feet from a well.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Health – General
21–309.
(a) (1) In this section the following terms have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Mobile food service facility” means a food service facility which is a
mechanically, electrically, manually, or otherwise propelled vehicle operating on land or
water.
[(3) “On–farm food service facility” means a food service facility that:
(i) Is located on a farm;
(ii) Serves food as designated by the Department; and
(iii) Operates during a period of time of not more than 30 consecutive
days with up to two renewals in a 1–year period.]
[(4)] (3) “Temporary food service facility” means a food service facility
which operates during a period of time of not more than 30 consecutive days at a fixed
location in conjunction with a fair, carnival, public exhibition, construction project,
recreational facility, or similar gathering.
(b) (1) Except as provided in § 10–226 of the State Government Article and in
[paragraphs] PARAGRAPH (2) [and (3)] of this subsection, and unless it is renewed for
another term, a license expires 1 year from the date of issuance or renewal or as provided
by local law, ordinance, or regulation in accordance with § 21–304(b) and (c) of this subtitle.
(2) Except as provided in § 10–226 of the State Government Article, a
license to operate a temporary food service facility expires at the conclusion of the
underlying event or after 30 consecutive days of operation, whichever is earlier, or as
provided by local law, ordinance, or regulation in accordance with § 21–304(b) and (c) of
this subtitle.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 189
[(3) (i) Except as provided in § 10–226 of the State Government Article,
a license to operate an on–farm food service facility expires after 30 consecutive days unless
it is renewed in accordance with subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph.
(ii) An on–farm food service facility may renew an on–farm food
service facility license up to two times within a 1–year period.]
(c) Except in the case of a temporary food service facility, including a mobile food
service facility which operates solely as a temporary food service facility, [or an on–farm
food service facility,] at least 1 month before the license expires, the Department shall send
to the licensee, by first–class mail to the last known address of the licensee, a renewal notice
that states:
(1) The date on which the current license expires; and
(2) The date by which the completed renewal application must be received
by the Department for the renewal to be issued and mailed before the license expires.
21–309.3.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “ON–FARM FOOD SERVICE FACILITY” MEANS A FOOD
SERVICE FACILITY THAT:
(1) IS LOCATED ON A FARM; AND
(2) SERVES FOOD AS DESIGNATED BY THE DEPARTMENT.
(B) THERE IS AN ON–FARM FOOD SERVICE FACILITY LICENSE.
(C) THE FEE FOR AN ON–FARM FOOD SERVICE FACILITY LICENSE:
(1) SHALL BE DETERMINED BY THE DEPARTMENT BASED ON THE
ANTICIPATED COST OF LICENSING, INSPECTING, AND REGULATING LICENSEES; AND
(2) MAY NOT EXCEED $100.
(D) (1) AN ON–FARM FOOD SERVICE FACILITY LICENSE SHALL BE VALID
FOR A PERIOD OF 1 YEAR.
(2) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN § 10–226 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT
ARTICLE AND UNLESS IT IS RENEWED FOR ANOTHER TERM, AN ON–FARM FOOD
SERVICE FACILITY LICENSE EXPIRES 1 YEAR FROM THE DATE OF ISSUANCE OR
– 3 –

Ch. 189 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
RENEWAL OR AS PROVIDED BY LOCAL LAW, ORDINANCE, OR REGULATION IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 21–304(B) AND (C) OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(E) THE DEPARTMENT, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF THE
ENVIRONMENT AND, THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE, AND KEY
STAKEHOLDERS, INCLUDING THE APPROPRIATE DELEGATED APPROVAL
AUTHORITY AND AT LEAST ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF COUNTY GOVERNMENTS
DESIGNATED BY THE MARYLAND ASSOCIATION OF COUNTIES, SHALL ADOPT
REGULATIONS FOR AN ON–FARM FOOD SERVICE FACILITY REGARDING:
(1) ACCESS TO WATER FOR HANDWASHING AND FOOD PREPARATION;
(2) MANAGEMENT OF WASTEWATER;
(3) OUTDOOR COOKING AND FOOD PREPARATION;
(4) THE USE OF ON–FARM STRUCTURES FOR FOOD PREPARATION
AND PATRON SEATING;
(5) CONSISTENT WITH § 21–325(D) OF THIS SUBTITLE, TOILETING
FACILITIES; AND
(6) OTHER REQUIREMENTS AS NECESSARY FOR THE PROTECTION OF
PUBLIC HEALTH.
(F) IN ADOPTING REGULATIONS UNDER SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION,
THE DEPARTMENT MAY CONSIDER:
(1) THE NUMBER OF INDIVIDUALS EXPECTED TO PATRONIZE AN
ON–FARM FOOD SERVICE FACILITY;
(2) THE EXPECTED FREQUENCY OF OPERATION;
(3) HOW TO ASSESS CONSIDER THE CURRENT OR PLANNED PHYSICAL
STRUCTURES ASSOCIATED WITH AN ON–FARM FOOD SERVICE FACILITY; AND
(4) HOW TO ASSESS WHETHER THE ANTICIPATED OPERATION OF AN
ON–FARM FOOD SERVICE FACILITY IS CONSISTENT WITH THE CONTINUED
OPERATION OF THE FARM ON WHICH IT IS LOCATED.
(G) THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO:
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 189
(1) LIMIT THE APPLICATION OF ANY CURRENT OR FUTURE
APPLICABLE BUILDING CODES, ZONING CODES, LAND USE DESIGNATIONS, OR
PUBLIC HEALTH AND SAFETY REGULATIONS ENACTED BY A COUNTY OR OTHER
LOCAL GOVERNMENT TO AN ON–FARM FOOD SERVICE FACILITY; OR
(2) AUTHORIZE THE DEPARTMENT TO:
(I) CONDUCT OR REQUIRE AN ASSESSMENT OF THE VALUE OF
REAL PROPERTY;
(II) EVALUATE REAL PROPERTY FOR THE PURPOSE OF
VALUATION OR TAXATION; OR
(III) EXERCISE ANY AUTHORITY OTHERWISE RESERVED TO THE
STATE DEPARTMENT OF ASSESSMENTS AND TAXATION UNDER THE TAX –
PROPERTY ARTICLE.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 2 of this Act shall take
effect January 31, 2027.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, except as provided in Section
3 of this Act, this Act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 28, 2026.
– 5 –